Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2467
Duty of personal representative; inventory and appraisal.

Within three months after appointment, a personal representative, who is not a special administrator or a successor to another representative who has previously discharged this duty, shall prepare and file an inventory of property owned by the decedent at the time of death, listing it with reasonable detail and indicating as to each listed item its fair market value as of the date of the decedent's death and the type and amount of any encumbrance that may exist with reference to any item.

The personal representative shall send a copy of the inventory to interested persons who request it and shall file the original of the inventory with the court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 145, UPC § 3-706;

Laws 1992, LB 999, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 770, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 15.